West Virginia, session 2026, SB738.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1B. NATIONAL GUARD. §15-1B-15. National Guard Servicemember's Medical Readiness Act. (a) This section is known and may be cited as the "West Virginia National Guard Servicemember's Medical Readiness Act".(b) The West Virginia National Guard TRICARE Premium Reimbursement Program is hereby established within the Adjutant General’s department.(c) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "eligible recipient" means an individual who is:(1) A member of the West Virginia National Guard;(2) Eligible for TRICARE reserve select or TRICARE dental program coverage; and(3) In compliance with reimbursement requirements established by the Adjutant General pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.(d) Upon application by an eligible recipient, the Adjutant General’s department may award premium reimbursement grants to an eligible recipient for one or both of the following:(1) A premium paid for individual coverage for an eligible recipient through the TRICARE reserve select program; or(2) A premium paid for individual coverage for an eligible recipient through the TRICARE dental program.(e) If any portion of the premiums eligible for reimbursement under this section are later paid for, reimbursed, or otherwise provided to an eligible recipient by the federal government, then that portion shall cease to be reimbursed by the TRICARE Premium Reimbursement Program established by this section.(f) The Adjutant General shall adopt and publish written policies and guidelines, including reimbursement requirements and application procedures, to effectuate the purposes of this section.(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed as an appropriation of funds. Funding for the TRICARE Premium Reimbursement Program is subject to appropriation by the Legislature.(h) The provisions of this section shall be effective July 1, 2026.